magyarispell/tmp/magyar.aff
flag *ó: 


















 # -sít, -osít, -esít

ö k	>	-ök,ösít    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} EeX%
 # <belócásítanak>
ö k	>	-ök,ösítés    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcXTtY@Ÿ
 # <belócásításról>
    ö k	>	-ök,ösítési    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×VLjGRx!"
 # <hollósításinak>
        ö k	>	-ök,ösítésileg    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}+[lAg_MODE_adv] 
 # <hollósításilag>

ö k	>	-ök,ösítõ    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×BVLjcGRXY@
 # <belócásítókat>

ö k	>	-ök,ösített    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcGRtX%

ö k	>	-ök,ösített    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X

    ö k	>	-ök,ösítettség    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcTtXY@Ÿ

        ö k	>	-ök,ösítettségi    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×VLjGRx!"
 # <hollósítottsági>
            ö k	>	-ök,ösítettségileg    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}+[lAg_MODE_adv] 
 # <hollósítottsági>

ö k	>	-ök,ösítendõ    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[AndÓ_FUTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×BVLjcGRX%


ö k	>	-ök,ösítetlen    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAlAn_LESS_adj]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcGRtX%
 # ~20/2 (piacosítatlan, jelzálogosítatlan)
    ö k	>	-ök,ösítetlenség    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAlAn_LESS_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcRXY@Ÿ
 # ~5/0
        ö k	>	-ök,ösítetlenségi    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAlAn_LESS_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×VLjGRx!"
 # <hollósítatlansági>
            ö k	>	-ök,ösítetlenségileg    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAlAn_LESS_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}+[lAg_MODE_adv] 


ö k	>	-ök,ösíttet    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} EeX%

    ö k	>	-ök,ösíttetés    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcXTtY@Ÿ

        ö k	>	-ök,ösíttetési    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×VLjGRx!"
 # <hollósíttatási>
            ö k	>	-ök,ösíttetésileg    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}+[lAg_MODE_adv] 

    ö k	>	-ök,ösíttetõ    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×BVLjcGRX

    ö k	>	-ök,ösíttetett    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcGRtX%

    ö k	>	-ök,ösíttetett    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X

        #`k_'(síttetettség, +Osit, noun_con, noun_On, noun_nonmorph_, noun_jA, noun_Ai, pfx_verb, non_compound)
    ö k	>	-ök,ösíttetendõ    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[AndÓ_FUTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×BVLjcGRX%

ö k	>	-ök,ösíttethet    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X
 # 20/0
#(síttetget, Osit, verb_, verb_sub_, non_compound) # 0/0
ö k	>	-ök,ösíthet    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X

    #(síthetés, Osit, noun_con, noun_On, Noun_, pfx_verb, noun_A, noun_Ai) # 20/1 (megszámítógép-játékosíthatás)
    ö k	>	-ök,ösíthetõ    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×BVLjcGRX
 # >100/>5 (üvegesíthetõ, ívesítõ)
        ö k	>	-ök,ösíthetõség    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcTtXY@

    ö k	>	-ök,ösíthetetlen    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcGRtX%

        ö k	>	-ök,ösíthetetlenség    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcTtXY@
 # 5 szótag: i_kepzo felesleges
            ö k	>	-ök,ösíthetetlenségi    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×VLjGRx!"
 # <hollósíthatatlansági>
                ö k	>	-ök,ösíthetetlenségileg    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}+[lAg_MODE_adv] 

    ö k	>	-ök,ösíthetett    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcGRX%t

    ö k	>	-ök,ösíthetett    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X

    #(síthetendõ, Osit, noun_vow, noun_On, Noun_, Adj_, noun_jA, pfx_verb, non_compound)
ö k	>	-ök,ösítget    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X

    ö k	>	-ök,ösítgetés    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcXTt
 # 28
    ö k	>	-ök,ösítgetõ    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×BVLjcGRX
 # 
    ö k	>	-ök,ösítgetett    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcGRX%t

    ö k	>	-ök,ösítgetett    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X

    #(sítgetendõ, Osit, noun_vow, noun_On, Noun_, Adj_, noun_jA, pfx_verb, non_compound)
ö k	>	-ök,ösítgethet    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X
 # 8/0
    #(sítgethetés, Osit, noun_con, noun_On, Noun_, pfx_verb, noun_A, noun_Ai) # 0/0
    ö k	>	-ök,ösítgethetõ    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×BVLjcGRX
 # 1/0
        ö k	>	-ök,ösítgethetõség    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcTtX
 # 0
    #?(SÍTGeTHeTeTLeN, Osit, Noun_, Adj_, noun_jA, pfx_verb) # 0
        #?(SÍTGeTHeTeTLeNSéG, Osit, noun_nonadj, noun_A, noun_Ai) # 0
    ö k	>	-ök,ösítgethetett    +[sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
 # 0
    #(sítgethetendõ, Osit, noun_vow, noun_On, Noun_, Adj_, noun_jA, pfx_verb, non_compound) # 0

# -zik, -ozik, -ezik

# hangrend miatt külön
#`k_'(z, +_z_, verb_, verb_sub_, pfx_verb, non_compound) # <belócáz>
#`k_'(zik, +_z_, verb_, verb_sub_, pfx_verb, non_compound) # <belócázik>
ö k	>	-ök,özés    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcXTtY@Ÿ
 # <belócázás>
    ö k	>	-ök,özési    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×VLjGRx!"
 # <hollózásiról>
        ö k	>	-ök,özésileg    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}+[lAg_MODE_adv] 

ö k	>	-ök,özõ    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ÐÓ×BVLjcGRXY@
 # <belócázó>

#`k_'(zett, +_z_+Ott, noun_con, noun_OnA, noun_nonmorph_, Adj_, noun_jA, noun_Ai, pfx_verb, non_compound) # <belócázott>
ö k	>	-ök,özött    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
 # <belócázott>
    ö k	>	-ök,özöttség    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcTtXY@


#`k_'(zendõ, +_z_+AndO, noun_vow, noun_On, Noun_, Adj_, noun_jA, pfx_verb, non_compound) # <belócázandóakat>

ö k	>	-ök,özetlen    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAlAn_LESS_adj]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcGRtX%
 # ~20/2 (piacozatlan, jelzálogozatlan)
    ö k	>	-ök,özetlenség    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAlAn_LESS_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcRXY@
 # ~5/0

ö k	>	-ök,öztet    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} EeX%

    ö k	>	-ök,öztetés    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcXTtY@

# (hangrend)   `k_'(ztetõ, +_z_+tAt+_O_, noun_vow, noun_On, Noun_, Adj_, noun_jA, pfx_verb, compound_)
    ö k	>	-ök,öztetett    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcGRtX%

    ö k	>	-ök,öztetett    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X

        #`k_'(ztetettség, +_z_, noun_con, noun_On, noun_nonmorph_, noun_jA, noun_Ai, pfx_verb, non_compound)
# (hangrend)    `k_'(ztetendõ, +_z_+tAt+AndO, noun_vow, noun_On, Noun_, Adj_, noun_jA, pfx_verb, non_compound)
#(ztethet, +_z_, verb_, verb_sub_, non_compound, pfx_verb) # 20/0
#(ztetget, +_z_, verb_, verb_sub_, non_compound, pfx_verb) # 0/0
ö k	>	-ök,özhet    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X

    #(zhetés, +_z_, noun_con, noun_On, Noun_, pfx_verb, noun_A, noun_Ai) # 20/1 (megszámítógép-játékosíthatás)
# (hangrend)    `k_'(zhetõ, +_z_+_hAt_+_O_, noun_vow, noun_On, Noun_, Adj_, noun_jA, pfx_verb) # >100/>5 (üvegesíthetõ, ívesítõ)
        ö k	>	-ök,özhetõség    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcTtXY@

    ö k	>	-ök,özhetetlen    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcGRtX. %

        ö k	>	-ök,özhetetlenség    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcTtXY@

    ö k	>	-ök,özhetett    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X

    #(zhetendõ, +_z_, noun_vow, noun_On, Noun_, Adj_, noun_jA, pfx_verb, non_compound)
ö k	>	-ök,özget    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X

    ö k	>	-ök,özgetés    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcXTtY@
 # 28
# (hangrend)    `k_'(zgetõ, +_z_+gAt+_O_, noun_vow, noun_On, Noun_, Adj_, noun_jA, pfx_verb) # 
    ö k	>	-ök,özgetett    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} nòÓ×BVLjcGRX%t

    ö k	>	-ök,özgetett    +[z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X

    #(zgetendõ, +_z_, noun_vow, noun_On, Noun_, Adj_, noun_jA, pfx_verb, non_compound)
